District of Columbia statutes.
26-311.01

Examinations.

(a)

The Commissioner, or his or her designated agent, shall examine the affairs, business, premises, and records of each licensee at least once in every 3-year period and at any other time that the Commissioner considers necessary or provides by regulation.

(b)

Each licensee shall be assessed an examination fee of $100 per examination, plus $20 per hour for each hour or fraction of each hour in excess of 4 hours if an examination of a licensee exceeds 4 hours.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 12a
as added Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3102, 48 DCR 6981
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2802 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).